North Carolina, session 2025, SB816.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. FUNDS FOR RECIPIENTS OF THE CHILDREN OF WARTIME VETERANS
SCHOLARSHIP IN THE 2025-2026 ACADEMIC YEAR
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to the State Education Assistance Authority
(Authority) to increase award amounts for recipients of scholarships for the children of wartime
veterans for the 2025-2026 academic year up to the full amounts permitted under Part 2 of Article
14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes to the extent those award amounts were reduced by
the Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs pursuant to the award flexibility
provided in Part VI of S.L. 2025-72. If any of these funds remain after increasing award amounts
for scholarship recipients in accordance with this section, the Authority may use the remaining
funds to award additional scholarships for qualifying children of wartime veterans under Part 2
of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, beginning in the 2026-2027 academic
year.

PART II. FUNDS FOR ADDITIONAL AWARDS FOR THE CHILDREN OF WARTIME
VETERANS SCHOLARSHIP IN THE 2026-2027 ACADEMIC YEAR
SECTION 2.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 143B-1226, for new applications for
scholarships for children of wartime veterans under Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the
General Statutes, the Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs may increase
the number of Class II and Class III scholarships awarded in the 2026-2027 academic year from
100 to 200 children in each class.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the Escheat Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in
recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the State Education
Assistance Authority to support additional scholarships for qualifying children of wartime
veterans under Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S816-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART III. EXPAND EXISTING FLEXIBILITY FOR THE CHILDREN OF WARTIME
VETERANS SCHOLARSHIP FUNDS PROGRAM TO INCLUDE THE 2026-2027
ACADEMIC YEAR
SECTION 3. Section 6 of S.L. 2025-72 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 6.(a) For purposes of subsection (b) of this section, the following definitions
shall apply:
(1) Authority. – The State Education Assistance Authority.
(2) Commission. – The Veterans' Affairs Commission of the Department.
(3) Department. – The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(4) Program. – The program administered by the Department to award scholarship
funds that is referred to as Scholarships for Children of Wartime Veterans.
(5) Scholarship funds. – Scholarship funds awarded to the child of a North
Carolina veteran under Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes.
(6) Secretary. – The Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
"SECTION 6.(b) Notwithstanding Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes and any rules adopted or determinations made by the Veterans Affairs Commission, for
the 2024-2025 academic year and the 2025-2026 academic year, 2024-2025, 2025-2026, and
2026-2027 academic years, the following shall apply relating to the administration of scholarship
funds under the Program:
(1) Within funds available for the Program, the following shall be determined:
a. Due to the sacrifice of veterans for the State of North Carolina and the
unique needs and challenges of the children of wartime veterans to
ensure they have the greatest opportunities to reach their higher
education attainment goals, if there are additional eligible recipients,
other than those identified by the Department under this Program, who
are attending public colleges and universities of the State who may
qualify to have their scholarships funded with monies from the Escheat
Fund, the Authority, after consultation with the Secretary, may fund
those scholarships with monies from the Escheat Fund.
b. For the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 academic years, the following shall
occur:
1. After consultation with the Authority, the Secretary shall
determine whether to prioritize the award of new applicants for
the 2025-2026 academic year as follows:
I. in In Class I-A, I-B, and IV scholarships, prior to
awarding Class II and III scholarships. Class II and
Class III awards may be determined following awards
for Class I-A, I-B, and IV depending on the availability
of funds for the Program.
II. For the 2026-2027 academic year only, in scholarships
for new applicants who meet the following
requirements:
A. Apply to receive scholarships as undergraduate
students.
B. Qualify as residents for tuition purposes under
the criteria set forth in G.S. 116-143.1 and in
accordance with the coordinated and
centralized residency determination process
administered by the Authority.
Page 2 Senate Bill 816-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
C. Are otherwise eligible to receive scholarships in
accordance with the Program requirements.
c.2. The Secretary, after consulting with the Authority, may
determine the following based on the number of eligible
students, including new and renewal students, that have
applied for the 2025-2026 academic year, students:
I. For the 2025-2026 academic year, whether to reduce
the room and board allowance award for students
attending a public institution and the maximum
allowance award for students attending private
institutions, prior to August 15, 2025.
II. For the 2026-2027 academic year, whether to establish
a standardized payment schedule or formula within
available funds for the academic year to ensure the
efficient and effective administration of the
scholarships.
d.3. After the actions set forth in sub-subdivisions a., b., and c. of
this subdivision have been taken, for awards for the 2025-2026
academic year, After the preceding actions have been taken, if
funds available for the Program are still insufficient to provide
scholarships to all eligible students, the Authority may adjust
and standardize award amounts as necessary, including
establishing a lottery and providing pro rata scholarship awards
for room and board, or both, for the applicable academic year,
to ensure the efficient administration of the scholarship funds.
(2) All scholarship notifications shall include language that the award of the
scholarship is contingent upon the availability of funds.
(3) The Authority shall disburse scholarship funds in accordance with
G.S. 116-204(11a).
(4) From the total amount of funding appropriated to the Board of Governors of
The University of North Carolina and allocated to the Authority in a fiscal
year to support the award of scholarship funds under the Program, the
Authority may use an amount of up to two and one-half percent (2.5%) for
administration costs related to the Program from the allocation from the
General Fund. The Authority shall place any unexpended and unencumbered
appropriated funds remaining at the end of the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026
fiscal years 2024-2025, 2025-2026, and 2026-2027 fiscal years into an
institutional trust fund established in accordance with the provisions of
G.S. 116-36.1. Those funds may be used for the purpose of awarding
scholarships under the Program and for administration costs of the Authority
related to the Program.
"SECTION 6.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025, and applies to awards
granted for the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 academic years.2024-2025, 2025-2026, and
2026-2027 academic years."

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 816-First Edition Page 3